West Virginia, session 2025, SB407.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Sanitarians. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-17-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Sanitarians to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 18, 2024, relating to the Board of Sanitarians (the practice of public health sanitation, 20 CSR 04), is authorized.